Missouri, session 2026, SB1071.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 166.700, 166.705, and 166.720, RSMo,
are repealed and three new sections enacted in lieu thereof, to
be known as sections 166.700, 166.705, and 166.720, to read as
follows:
166.700. As used in sections 166.700 to 166.720, the
following terms mean:
(1) "Curriculum", a complete course of study for a
particular content area or grade level, including any
supplemental materials;
(2) "District", the same meaning as used in section
160.011;
(3) "Educational assistance organization", the same
meaning as used in section 135.712;
(4) "Illegal alien", any person who is not lawfully
present in the United States or any person who gained
illegal entry into the United States;
(5) "Parent", the same meaning as used in section
135.712;
(6) "Private school", a school that is not a part of
the public school system of the state of Missouri and that
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1071 2
charges tuition for the rendering of elementary or secondary
educational services;
(7) "Program", the same meaning as used in section
135.712;
(8) "Qualified school", an FPE school or any of the
following entities that is incorporated in Missouri and that
does not discriminate on the basis of race, color, or
national origin:
(a) A charter school as defined in section 160.400;
(b) A private school;
(c) A public school as defined in section 160.011; or
(d) A public or private virtual school;
(9) "Qualified student", any [elementary or secondary
school student who is a] resident of this state, who is not
an illegal alien, and who[:
(a) Has an approved "individualized education plan"
(IEP) developed under the federal Individuals with
Disabilities Education Act (IDEA), 20 U.S.C. Section 1400 et
seq., as amended; or
(b) Is a member of a household whose total annual
income does not exceed an amount equal to three hundred
percent of the income standard used to qualify for free and
reduced price lunches, and that meets at least one of the
following qualifications:
a. Attended a public school as a full-time student for
at least one semester during the previous twelve months;
b. Is a child who is eligible to begin kindergarten or
first grade under sections 160.051 to 160.055; or
c. Is a sibling of a qualified student who received a
scholarship grant in the previous school year and will
receive a scholarship grant in the current school year] is
eligible to enroll in a public school in this state in any

SB 1071 3
of grades kindergarten through grade twelve or to receive
early childhood special education services pursuant to
section 162.700.
166.705. 1. A parent of a qualified student may
establish a Missouri empowerment scholarship account for the
student by entering into a written agreement with an
educational assistance organization. The agreement shall
provide that:
(1) The qualified student shall enroll in a qualified
school and receive an education in at least the subjects of
English language arts, mathematics, social studies, and
science;
(2) Except for a qualified student who is in the
custody of the state, the qualified student shall not be
enrolled in a public school or early childhood special
education services operated by, or a charter school located
within, the qualified student's district of residence and
shall release the district of residence from all obligations
to educate the qualified student while the qualified student
is enrolled in the program. This subdivision shall not be
construed to relieve the student's district of residence
from the obligation to conduct an evaluation for
disabilities;
(3) The qualified student shall receive a grant, in
the form of moneys deposited in accordance with section
135.714, in the qualified student's Missouri empowerment
scholarship account;
(4) The moneys deposited in the qualified student's
Missouri empowerment scholarship account shall be used only
for the following expenses of the qualified student:
(a) Tuition or fees at a qualified school;
(b) Textbooks required by a qualified school;

SB 1071 4
(c) Educational therapies or services from a licensed
or accredited practitioner or provider including, but not
limited to, licensed or accredited paraprofessionals or
educational aides;
(d) Tutoring services;
(e) Curriculum;
(f) Tuition or fees for a private virtual school;
(g) Fees for a nationally standardized norm-referenced
achievement test, advanced placement examinations,
international baccalaureate examinations, or any
examinations related to college or university admission;
(h) Fees for management of the Missouri empowerment
scholarship account by firms selected by the educational
assistance organization;
(i) Services provided by a public school including,
but not limited to, individual classes and extracurricular
programs;
(j) Computer hardware or other technological devices
that are used to help meet the qualified student's
educational needs and that are approved by an educational
assistance organization. For purposes of this paragraph,
"computer hardware or other technological devices" includes
calculators, personal computers, laptops, tablet devices,
microscopes, telescopes, and printers, but does not include
entertainment and other primarily noneducational devices,
such as televisions, telephones, video game consoles and
accessories, and home theater and audio equipment;
(k) Fees for summer education programs and specialized
after-school education programs;
(l) Transportation costs for mileage to and from a
qualified school, or a commuter pass for the qualified

SB 1071 5
student for transportation between the qualified student's
residence and a qualified school; and
(5) Moneys deposited in the qualified student's
Missouri empowerment scholarship account shall not be used
for the following:
(a) Consumable educational supplies including, but not
limited to, paper, pens, pencils, or markers;
(b) Tuition at a private school located outside of the
state of Missouri; and
(c) Payments or reimbursements to any person related
within the third degree of consanguinity or affinity to a
qualified student.
2. Missouri empowerment scholarship accounts are
renewable on an annual basis upon request of the parent of a
qualified student. Notwithstanding any changes to the
qualified student's multidisciplinary evaluation team plan,
a student who has previously qualified for a Missouri
empowerment scholarship account shall remain eligible to
apply for renewal until the student completes high school
and submits scores to the state treasurer from a nationally
standardized norm-referenced achievement test, advanced
placement examination, international baccalaureate
examination, or any examination related to college or
university admission purchased with Missouri empowerment
scholarship account funds.
3. A signed agreement under this section shall satisfy
the compulsory school attendance requirements of section
167.031.
4. A qualified school or a provider of services
purchased under this section shall not share, refund, or
rebate any Missouri empowerment scholarship account moneys
with the parent or qualified student in any manner.

SB 1071 6
5. If a qualified student withdraws from the program
by enrolling in a school other than a qualified school or is
disqualified from the program under the provisions of
section 166.710, the qualified student's Missouri
empowerment scholarship account shall be closed and any
remaining funds shall be returned to the educational
assistance organization for redistribution to other
100 qualified students. Under such circumstances, the
101 obligation to provide an education for such student shall
102 transfer back to the student's district of residence.
103 6. Any funds remaining in a qualified student's
104 Missouri empowerment scholarship account at the end of a
105 school year shall remain in the account and shall not be
106 returned to the educational assistance organization. Any
107 funds remaining in a qualified student's Missouri
108 empowerment scholarship account upon graduation from a
109 qualified school shall be returned to the educational
110 assistance organization for redistribution to other
111 qualified students.
112 7. Moneys received under sections 166.700 to 166.720
113 shall not constitute Missouri taxable income to the parent
114 of the qualified student.
115 8. The provisions of this section shall not be
116 construed to:
117 (1) Require a qualified student to withdraw from a
118 school district or charter school before applying for a
119 Missouri empowerment scholarship account if the qualified
120 student withdraws from the school district or charter school
121 before receiving any moneys in the qualified student's
122 empowerment scholarship account; or

SB 1071 7
123 (2) Prevent a qualified student from applying in
124 advance for a Missouri empowerment scholarship account to be
125 funded beginning in the following school year.
166.720. 1. Sections 166.700 to 166.720 shall not be
construed to:
(1) Permit any governmental agency to exercise control
or supervision over any qualified school in which a
qualified student enrolls other than a qualified school that
is a public school; or
(2) Expand the regulatory authority of this state, its
officers, or any school district, with respect to the
imposition of any additional requirements or restrictions on
qualified schools, beyond those necessary to enforce the
requirements of the Missouri empowerment scholarship
accounts program.
2. A qualified school, other than a qualified school
that is a public school, that accepts a payment from a
parent under sections 166.700 to 166.720 shall not be
considered an agent of the state or federal government due
to its acceptance of the payment.
3. A qualified school shall not be required to alter
its creed, practices, admissions policy, or curriculum in
order to accept students whose parents pay tuition or fees
from a Missouri empowerment scholarship account to
participate as a qualified school.
4. (1) Any qualified student receiving a Missouri
empowerment scholarship who leaves a public school or
charter school, as such terms are defined in chapter 160, in
the qualified student's resident school district to enroll
in a qualified school that is not the qualified student's
resident school district shall continue to be counted in the
resident public school or charter school's weighted average

SB 1071 8
daily attendance as a resident student for the purposes of
determining state and federal aid for the qualified
student's resident school district or charter school.
(2) The qualified student will continue to be counted
for such purpose as provided:
(a) For five years after the qualified student no
longer attends school in the qualified student's resident
school district;
(b) Until any calendar year that the qualified student
no longer receives grant money in their scholarship account;
(c) Until the qualified student is counted in the
weighted average daily attendance for a public school or
charter that they are a resident student in; or
(d) Until the qualified student graduates.
(3) The educational assistance organization and the
state treasurer shall provide the necessary information to
the department of elementary and secondary education to
allow the federal and state aid to continue to the public
school or charter school in the qualified student's resident
school district previously attended by the qualified student.
(4) The provisions of this subsection shall terminate
five years after August 28, 2021.
5. In any legal proceeding challenging the application
of sections 166.700 to 166.720 to a qualified school, the
state shall bear the burden of establishing that the law is
necessary and does not impose any undue burden on qualified
schools.
6. The provisions of section 23.253 of the Missouri
sunset act shall not apply to sections 166.700 to 166.720.
✓